District of Columbia statutes.
47-4661

Tibetan community property; Lot 30, Square 139.

The real property described as Lot 30, Square 139 shall be exempt from real property taxation so long as the real property is owned and used by the International Campaign for Tibet, an organization approved under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code , and used solely to further its tax-exempt purposes, including continuing to offer programs that are open and free to the general public, such as lectures, films, art exhibits, a library of Tibetan materials, and meeting space for the Tibetan and Buddhist communities of the District.

History

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 7222(b), 60 DCR 12472

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 7222 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 7222 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short Title

Section 7221 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle V of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Tibetan Community Real Property Tax Exemption and Relief Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.